Vermont statutes. Title 26 Professions and Occupations
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 561.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Board” means the Board of Dental Examiners.

“Director” means the Director of the Office of Professional Regulation.

“Practicing dentistry” means an activity in which a person:

undertakes by any means or method to diagnose or profess to diagnose or to treat or profess to treat or to prescribe for or profess to prescribe for any lesions, diseases, disorders, for deficiencies of the human oral cavity, teeth, gingiva, maxilla, or mandible or adjacent associated structures;

extracts human teeth or corrects malpositions of the teeth or jaws;

furnishes, supplies, constructs, reproduces, or repairs prosthetic dentures, bridges, appliances, or other structures to be used or worn as substitutes for natural teeth or adjusts those structures, except on the written prescription of a duly licensed dentist and by the use of impressions or casts made by a duly licensed and practicing dentist;

administers general dental anesthetics;

administers local dental anesthetics, except dental hygienists as authorized by Board rule; or

engages in any of the practices included in the curricula of recognized dental colleges.

“Dental therapist” means an individual licensed to practice as a dental therapist under this chapter.

“Dental hygienist” means an individual licensed to practice as a dental hygienist under this chapter.

“Dental assistant” means an individual registered to practice as a dental assistant under this chapter.

“Direct supervision” means supervision by a licensed dentist who is readily available at the dental facility for consultation or intervention.

“General supervision” means:

the direct or indirect oversight of a dental therapist by a dentist, which need not be on-site; or

the oversight of a dental hygienist by a dentist as prescribed by Board rule in accordance with sections 582 and 624 of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2015, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 2, 2016.

§ 562.
Prohibitions.

No person may use in connection with a name any words, including “Doctor of Dental Surgery” or “Doctor of Dental Medicine,” or any letters, signs, or figures, including the letters “D.D.S.” or “D.M.D.,” that imply that a person is a licensed dentist when not authorized under this chapter.

No person may practice as a dentist, dental therapist, or dental hygienist unless currently licensed to do so under the provisions of this chapter.

No person may practice as a dental assistant unless currently registered under the provisions of this chapter.

A person who violates this section shall be subject to the penalties provided in

3 V.S.A. § 127

.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2015, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 2, 2016.

§ 563.
Exemptions.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to the following:

the rights and privileges of physicians licensed under the laws of this State.

an unlicensed person from performing merely mechanical work upon inert matter in a dental office or laboratory.

a dental student currently enrolled in a dental school or college accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association who:

provides dental treatment under the supervision of a licensed dentist at a State hospital or under licensed instructors within a dental school, college, or dental department of a university recognized by the Board;

serves as an intern in any hospital approved by the Board; or

participates in a supervised externship program authorized by a dental school recognized by the Board in order to provide dental treatment under the direct supervision of a dentist licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

upon prior application and approval by the Board, a student of a dental school or college accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association who provides dental treatment for purposes of clinical study under the direct supervision and instruction and in the office of a licensed dentist.

a dentist licensed in another state from consulting with a dentist licensed under the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 564.
Ownership and operation of a dental office or business.

A dental practice may be owned and operated by the following individuals or entities, either alone or in a combination thereof:

a dentist licensed under the provisions of this chapter;

a health department or clinic of this State or of a local government agency;

a federally qualified health center or community health center designated by the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services to provide dental services;

a 501(c)(3) nonprofit or charitable dental organization;

a hospital licensed under the laws of this State;

an institution or program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation of the American Dental Association to provide education and training.

The surviving spouse, the executor, or the administrator of the estate of a licensed dentist or the spouse of an incapacitated licensed dentist may employ a dentist licensed under the provisions of this chapter to terminate the practice of the deceased or incapacitated dentist within a reasonable length of time.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.

§ 565.
Display of license or registration.

Every dentist, dental therapist, dental hygienist, and dental assistant shall display a copy of his or her current license or registration at each place of practice and in such a manner so as to be easily seen and read.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13; amended

2015, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 2, 2016.

§ 566.
Nondental anesthesia.

A dentist may administer nondental anesthesia if he or she meets the following requirements:

the administration of anesthesia occurs only in a hospital where the dentist is credentialed to perform nondental anesthesiology;

the dentist holds an academic appointment in anesthesiology at an accredited medical school;

the dentist has successfully completed a full anesthesiology residency in a program approved by the Accreditation Council for Graduate Medical Education;

the dentist has a diploma from the National Board of Anesthesiology; and

the dentist practicing nondental anesthesia is held to the same standard of care as a physician administering anesthesia under the same or similar circumstances.

The Board shall refer a complaint or disciplinary proceeding about a dentist arising from his or her administration of nondental anesthesiology to the Board of Medical Practice, which shall have jurisdiction to investigate and sanction and limit or revoke the dentist’s license to the same extent that it may for physicians licensed under chapter 23 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 116

(Adj. Sess.), § 13.